test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-mai_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - mai: # Noun 16 'eng /est mai/fin' - full paradigm
     mai+N+Sg+Nom: mai
     mai+N+Sg+Gen: mai
     mai+N+Sg+Par: maiõ
     mai+N+Sg+Dat: maiõn
     mai+N+Sg+Ins: maiõks
     mai+N+Sg+Ill: maiõ
     mai+N+Sg+Ela: maiõst
     mai+N+Pl+Nom: maid
     mai+N+Pl+Gen: maid
     mai+N+Pl+Par: maiḑi
     mai+N+Pl+Dat: maidõn
     mai+N+Pl+Ins: maidõks
     mai+N+Pl+Ill: maiži
     mai+N+Pl+Ela: maišti
